Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.160

Claims of persons injured prior to effective date.

Any person who has been injured as a result of a "criminal act" as herein defined on or after January 1, 1972 up to July 1, 1974, who would otherwise be eligible for benefits under this chapter, may for a period of ninety days from July 1, 1974, file a claim for benefits with the department on a form provided by the department. The department shall investigate and review such claims, and, within two hundred ten days of July 1, 1974, shall report to the governor its findings and recommendations as to such claims, along with a statement as to what special legislative relief, if any, the department recommends should be provided.

[ 1986 c 158 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 122: See RCW 7.68.900 and note following.